Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 598.1, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8. âPostsecondary education subsidyâ means an amount which either of the parties may be required to pay under a temporary order or final judgment or decree for educational expenses of a child who is between the ages of eighteen and twenty-two years if the child is regularly attending a course of career and technical training either as a part of a regular school program or under special arrangements adapted to the individual personâs needs; or is, in good faith, a full-time student in a college, university, or community college; or has been accepted for admission to a college, university, or community college and the next regular term has not yet begun. Sec. 2. Section 598.21F, Code 2025, is amended by striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 598.21F Postsecondary education subsidy. The court shall not order either of the parties to pay a postsecondary education subsidy under a temporary order or final judgment or decree. Senate File 513, p. 2 Sec. 3. Section 598.22, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5. Prompt payment of sums required to be paid under sections 598.10 , 598.21A , 598.21B , 598.21C , and 598.21E , and 598.21F is the essence of such orders or judgments and the court may act pursuant to section 598.23 regardless of whether the amounts in default are paid prior to the contempt hearing. Sec. 4. Section 600.11, subsection 2, paragraph a, subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: (5) A person who is ordered to pay support or a postsecondary education subsidy pursuant to section 598.21F , or chapter 234 , 252A , 252C , 252F , 598 , 600B , or any other chapter of the Code, for a person eighteen years of age or older who is being adopted by a stepparent, and the support order or order requires payment of support or postsecondary education subsidy for any period of time after the child reaches eighteen years of age. Sec. 5. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to a support order, decree, or judgment entered or pending on or after July 1, 2025. This Act shall not be the basis for modification of an order, decree, or judgment entered before July 1, 2025, that provides for a postsecondary education subsidy. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 513, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor